Utah statutes.
13-46-202.   Duties of the council.

(1)  The council shall:

(a)  direct the design of a database described in Part 3, Independent Contractor Database, so that the database may be accessed by one or more accessing agencies by no later than July 1, 2009;

(b)  beginning July 1, 2009, meet quarterly:

(i)  with:

(A)  the attorney general or a designee of the attorney general;

(B)  the chair of the State Tax Commission or a designee of the chair; and

(C)  the commissioner of the Department of Public Safety or the commissioner's designee; and

(ii) (A)  to review the most recent results from the database; and

(B)  to coordinate regulatory and law enforcement efforts; and

(c)  subject to Subsection (2), report by no later than November 30 of each year concerning the effectiveness of the database to:

(i)  the governor; and

(ii)  the Business and Labor Interim Committee.

(2)  The council may study how to do the following:

(a)  reduce costs to the state resulting from the misclassification of workers as independent contractors;

(b)  extend outreach and education efforts regarding the nature and requirements of independent contractor status;

(c)  promote efficient and effective information sharing amongst the member agencies; and

(d)  coordinate with the Uninsured Motorist Identification Database.

(3) (a)  The council shall make a report required by this Subsection (3) to the Business and Labor Interim Committee by no later than November 30 of 2008, 2009, 2010, and 2011.

(b)  As part of the report required by this Subsection (3), the chairs of the Business and Labor Interim Committee shall provide an opportunity to the following to report to the Business and Labor Interim Committee on the usefulness of the database:

(i)  each accessing agency;

(ii)  the attorney general; and

(iii)  the Department of Public Safety.

(c)  The council shall include in the report required by this Subsection (3):

(i)  an update on the design, implementation, and operation of the database;

(ii)  findings regarding the nature and extent of the misclassification of workers as independent contractors in this state;

(iii)  the results of regulatory and enforcement activities related to the database; and

(iv)  recommended legislative changes, if any, related to Subsection (2) or this Subsection (3).

